Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.320

Actions or claims arising from construction, alteration, repair, design, planning, survey, engineering, etc., of improvements upon real property—Construction.

Nothing in RCW 4.16.300 through 4.16.320 shall be construed as extending the period now permitted by law for bringing any kind of action.

[ 1967 c 75 s 3.]